Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. Felonious Death

§ 2-14-101.
Taking of life precludes one from inheritance, insurance or survivorship benefits; how benefits distributed; notification of insurer necessary.

No person who feloniously takes or causes or procures another to take the life of another shall:

Inherit from or take by devise or legacy from the deceased person any portion of his estate;

Inherit, receive or otherwise take any property held with the deceased person in a joint tenancy with rights of survivorship, tenancy by the entirety or any other form of co-ownership with rights of survivorship;

Inherit, receive or otherwise take any property conveyed by the deceased person by beneficiary designation, transfer on death designation, payable on death designation or other conveyance that occurs because of the death of the deceased person;

Serve through nomination, appointment or otherwise in any fiduciary or representative capacity for the deceased person, including as a personal representative, executor, trustee or agent. Any provision in a governing instrument conferring any power of appointment on the killer shall be deemed to have been terminated at the time immediately preceding the killing of the deceased person.

No beneficiary of any policy of life or accident insurance or certificates of membership issued by any benevolent association or organization, payable upon the death of any person, who in like manner takes or causes or procures another to take the life of another, shall take the proceeds of such policy or certificate.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section in every instance mentioned in this section all benefits that would accrue to the killer upon the death of the person whose life is taken shall become subject to distribution among the other beneficiaries or heirs of the deceased person according to the will, trust or other valid dispositive instrument of the deceased person as though the killer has predeceased the deceased person, or if no such valid instrument exists, according to the rules of descent and distribution. However, an insurance company is discharged of all liability under a policy issued by it upon payment of the proceeds in accordance with the terms thereof unless before payment the company receives written notice by or in behalf of some claimant other than the beneficiary named in the policy that a claim to the proceeds of the policy will be made by heirs of the deceased under the provisions of this section.

For purposes of paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, the interests of the deceased person and the killer in property held by them at the time of the killing as joint tenants with the right of survivorship, tenants by entirety or any other form of co-ownership with rights of survivorship shall be deemed to have been terminated at the time immediately preceding the killing of the deceased person and the interests of the deceased person and the killer shall be recognized as tenancies in common.

As used in this section, “killer” means the person who feloniously takes or causes or procures another to take the life of another person as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 7010; R.S. 1931, § 88-4009; C.S. 1945, § 6-2518; W.S. 1957, § 2-46; W.S. 1977, §

2-3-111

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2021 ch. 117, § 1, effective April 6, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

added the (a)(i) designation and made related changes; added (a)(ii) through (a)(iv); in the first sentence of (c), added "Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section" at the beginning, substituted "the killer" for "any such person" following "accrue to," added "beneficiaries or," "will, trust or other valid dispositive instrument of the deceased person as though the killer has predeceased the deceased person, or if no such valid instrument exists, according to the" and made related changes; and added (d) and (e).

Laws 2021, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

Legislative intent. —

The legislature intended in this section to give force to the rule of the common law that no man shall be permitted to profit by his own wrongful act. To adopt the interpretation that a person is barred from receiving insurance proceeds by conviction of killing under circumstances such as to render the killing a felony would be to prohibit those so convicted from taking although they had no intention or desire to actually kill or even harm the insured. Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Section was enacted as codification of common law.

Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 106 F.2d 561,

1939 U.S. App. LEXIS 4715

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1939), cert. dismissed, 309 U.S. 691, 60 S. Ct. 468, 84 L. Ed. 1033, 1940 U.S. LEXIS 985 (U.S. 1940); Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Only one who slays intentionally and wrongfully is barred

under this section. Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

This section is meant to apply to those wrongdoers who intentionally cause the wrong. Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

And not those who may have been negligent. —

See Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Under judicial interpretation of “feloniously.” —

Where a person was indicted for the second degree murder of his wife but pleaded guilty to manslaughter, while it appeared that he unlawfully caused the death of his wife, there was nothing before the court to show the killing was intentional, which circumstance — under the supreme court's interpretation of the meaning of the word “feloniously” — is essential to any determination that his rights to insurance were forfeited. Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Even though “intentionally” not used in section. —

Historically, in the absence of a statute, the various jurisdictions of this country have held a beneficiary who has intentionally and feloniously caused the death of the insured may not collect the insurance proceeds. It seems quite clear that this section was enacted as a codification of the common law. It is true that the word “intentionally” is not employed in this section. However, the background of interpretation in the field is convincing that such is the only reasonable meaning which can be given. Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Criminal intent issue of material fact. —

Whether a person had a criminal intent which precluded him from recovering insurance proceeds under this section presents a genuine issue of material fact. Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Distribution provision deemed in harmony with insurance statutes. —

The provision of this section as to distribution by the administrator to the heirs is in harmony with the statute which exempts life insurance money from the claims of creditors of the insured. Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 106 F.2d 561,

1939 U.S. App. LEXIS 4715

(10th Cir. 1939), cert. dismissed, 309 U.S. 691, 60 S. Ct. 468, 84 L. Ed. 1033, 1940 U.S. LEXIS 985 (1940); Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970). See now §

26-15-131

.

And has been held similar in effect to Wrongful Death Statute. —

See State ex rel. Sheehan v. District Court, 426 P.2d 431,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1967).

Section prevents disposition of proceeds to contingent insurance beneficiary. —

While a number of states, perhaps the majority, which have no express provision for insurance proceeds, hold that, when a primary beneficiary is barred, the proceeds should be paid to the contingent beneficiary, this section clearly prevents such disposition by its provision that “all benefits that would accrue to any such person upon the death of the person whose life is thus taken, shall become subject to distribution among the other heirs of such deceased person according to the rules of descent and distribution.” Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Phrase “subject to distribution”

is a phrase commonly used in connection with the administration of estates; if the intent of the legislature was to vest the cause of action directly in the heirs, the language used is an awkward and inapposite means of expressing a simple thought. Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 106 F.2d 561,

1939 U.S. App. LEXIS 4715

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1939), cert. dismissed, 309 U.S. 691, 60 S. Ct. 468, 84 L. Ed. 1033, 1940 U.S. LEXIS 985 (U.S. 1940); Dowdell v. Bell, 477 P.2d 170,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1970).

Transfers right to insurance proceeds. —

Murder of an insured by the beneficiary does not relieve insurer of liability but merely transfers right to the proceeds of the insurance to others, to be distributed according to the laws of descent and distribution. Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 106 F.2d 561, 1939 U.S. App. LEXIS 4715 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1939), cert. dismissed, 309 U.S. 691, 60 S. Ct. 468, 84 L. Ed. 1033, 1940 U.S. LEXIS 985 (U.S. 1940).

Law reviews. —

For a comment, “Disposition of Property Held by Entirety Where One Spouse Murders the Other,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 266.

For a note on the right of the murderer of an ancestor to inherit, see 8 Wyo. L.J. 132.

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion ‘Albatross’ Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Felonious killing of ancestor as affecting intestate succession, 39 ALR2d 477.

Homicide as precluding taking under will or by intestacy, 25 ALR4th 787.